Nevada, session 83, AB110.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 408 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. State Route 163, as now or hereafter located in
this State, is designated as the Colorado River Highway.
2. The Director shall place suitable markers along State
Route 163 and may locate them at such points as the Director
deems appropriate.
Sec. 3. 1. The bridge which connects State Route 163 with
Bullhead City, Arizona, as now or hereafter located in this State, is
designated as the Donald J. Laughlin Memorial Bridge.
2. The Director shall place suitable markers along the bridge
and may locate them at such points as the Director deems
appropriate.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)